Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.050

Voluntary change to electoral system—Notice—New elections—Districting.

(1)(a) Prior to the adoption of its proposed plan, the political subdivision must provide public notice to residents of the subdivision about the proposed remedy to a potential violation of RCW 29A.92.020. If a significant segment of the residents of the subdivision have limited English proficiency and speaks a language other than English, the political subdivision must:

(i) Provide accurate written and verbal notice of the proposed remedy in languages that diverse residents of the political subdivision can understand, as indicated by demographic data; and

(ii) Air radio or television public service announcements describing the proposed remedy broadcast in the languages that diverse residents of the political subdivision can understand, as indicated by demographic data.

(b) The political subdivision shall hold at least one public hearing on the proposed plan at least one week before adoption.

(c) For purposes of this section, "significant segment of the community" means five percent or more of residents, or five hundred or more residents, whichever is fewer, residing in the political subdivision.

(2)(a) If the political subdivision invokes its authority under RCW 29A.92.040 and the plan is adopted during the period of time between the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November and on or before January 15th of the following year, the political subdivision shall order new elections to occur at the next succeeding general election.

(b) If the political subdivision invokes its authority under RCW 29A.92.040 and the plan is adopted during the period of time between January 16th and on or before the first Monday of November, the next election will occur as scheduled and organized under the current electoral system, but the political subdivision shall order new elections to occur pursuant to the remedy at the general election the following calendar year.

(3) If a political subdivision implements a district-based election system under RCW 29A.92.040(2), the plan shall be consistent with the following criteria:

(a) Each district shall be as reasonably equal in population as possible to each and every other such district comprising the political subdivision.

(b) Each district shall be reasonably compact.

(c) Each district shall consist of geographically contiguous area.

(d) To the extent feasible, the district boundaries shall coincide with existing recognized natural boundaries and shall, to the extent possible, preserve existing communities of related and mutual interest.

(e) District boundaries may not be drawn or maintained in a manner that creates or perpetuates the dilution of the votes of the members of a protected class or classes.

(f) All positions on the governing body must stand for election at the next election for the governing body, scheduled pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The governing body may subsequently choose to stagger the terms of its positions.

(4) Within forty-five days after receipt of federal decennial census information applicable to a specific local area, the commission established in RCW 44.05.030 shall forward the census information to each political subdivision.

(5) No later than November 15th of each year ending in one, the governing body of the political subdivision that had previously invoked its authority under RCW 29A.92.040 to implement a district-based election system, or that was previously charged with redistricting under RCW 29A.92.110, shall prepare a plan for redistricting its districts, pursuant to RCW 29A.76.010, and in a manner consistent with this chapter.

[ 2021 c 173 s 4; (2021 c 173 s 3 expired January 1, 2023). Prior: 2019 c 454 s 1; 2019 c 64 s 8; 2018 c 113 s 202.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 173 ss 2 and 4: See note following RCW 29A.76.010.

Effective date—Expiration date—2021 c 173 ss 1 and 3: See notes following RCW 29A.76.010.

Retroactive application—2019 c 454: "This act applies retroactively to January 16, 2019." [ 2019 c 454 s 11.]

Effective date—2019 c 454: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 21, 2019]." [ 2019 c 454 s 13.]

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.